Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. Municipal Tax Increment Financing

§ 1903.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“District” or “TIF” means a tax increment financing district.

“Improvements” means the installation, new construction, or reconstruction of infrastructure to benefit a municipal tax increment financing district, including utilities, transportation, public facilities and amenities, land and property acquisition and demolition, and site preparation.

“Legislative body” means the mayor and alderboard, the city council, the selectboard, or the president and trustees of an incorporated village, as appropriate.

“Municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.

“Original taxable value” means the total valuation as determined in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located within the tax increment financing district as of the creation date as set forth in section 1904 of this subchapter, provided that no parcel within the district shall be divided or bisected by the district boundary.

“Related costs” means expenses incurred and paid by the municipality, exclusive of the actual cost of constructing and financing improvements, that are directly related to the creation and implementation of a municipal tax increment financing district, including reimbursement of sums previously advanced by the municipality for those purposes, direct municipal expenses such as departmental or personnel costs related to creating or administering the project, and audit costs allocable to the district.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 69

, § J.7, eff. June 28, 2017.

§ 1904.
Municipal tax increment financing district.

General authority. Notwithstanding any provision of subchapter 5 of this chapter or

32 V.S.A. § 5404a

to the contrary, upon approval of the legislative body of any municipality, a municipality may create a municipal tax increment financing district, and may incur debt to provide funding for improvements and related costs for the district.

Municipal approval; voter approval.

The legislative body of the municipality shall hold one or more public hearings to consider a municipal tax increment financing plan. Following public notice, hearing, and opportunity to comment, the legislative body of the municipality may grant approval of the plan.

When adopted by the act of the legislative body of that municipality, the plan shall be recorded with the municipal clerk and lister or assessor, and the creation of the district shall occur at 12:01 a.m. on April 1 of the calendar year so voted by the municipal legislative body.

The municipality may only incur debt for the project if the voters of the municipality approve the debt obligation by a majority vote at a regular or special meeting for which voting upon the debt obligation was properly warned.

Following final voter approval, the municipality has up to five years to incur debt pursuant to the financing plan.

Life of district.

A municipality may incur indebtedness against revenues of the municipal tax increment financing district over any period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality.

Any indebtedness incurred under subdivision (1) of this subsection may be retired over any period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality.

The district shall continue until the date and hour the indebtedness is retired or, if no debt is incurred, after the period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality to incur indebtedness.

Financing. During the life of an active district, the following apply, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:

Valuation.

Within 30 days of voter approval pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the lister or assessor for a municipality shall certify to the legislative body of the municipality the original taxable value of a tax increment financing district as of the date the voters approved the debt obligation.

On or before June 30 following voter approval and annually thereafter, the lister or assessor shall assess and certify to the legislative body the current value of a project parcel.

Tax rate.

The lister or assessor shall use the original taxable value of a project parcel when computing the municipal tax rate.

When calculating the amount of tax due on a project parcel, the treasurer shall apply the municipal tax rate to the current assessed value, rather than the original taxable value.

Tax increment.

The “tax increment” is the amount of tax paid on a project parcel, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection (d) using the current assessed value, that exceeds the amount of tax that would have been due if the tax rate were applied to the original taxable value.

The municipality may retain any share of the municipal tax increment to service the debt, beginning the first year in which debt is incurred.

A municipal tax increment financing district created pursuant to this subchapter is not authorized to retain any education property tax increment.

A municipality shall segregate the tax increment in a special account and in its official books and records.

Use of tax increment.

As of each date the municipality receives a tax payment and retains a portion of the tax increment pursuant to this section, the municipality shall use the portion of the municipal tax increment that is necessary to pay costs actually incurred as of that date for debt service and related costs.

If, after paying for improvements and related costs, there remains any excess portion of the tax increment, the municipality may retain the increment to prepay principal and interest on the financing, use for future financing payments, or use for defeasance of the financing.

Annual audit.

The municipality shall ensure that the segregated account for the tax increment financing district required by this section is subject to the annual audit requirements prescribed in sections 1681 and 1690 of this title.

Any audit procedures shall include verification of the original taxable value and current assessed value, expenditures for project debt service and related costs, annual and total tax increment funds generated, and allocation of tax increment funds.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 69

, § J.7, eff. June 28, 2017.